Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-545
Sections; applicability to policies issued under other laws.

Sections 60-501 to 60-569 shall not be held to apply to or affect policies of automobile insurance against liability which may now or hereafter be required by any other law of this state, and such policies, if they contain an agreement or are endorsed to conform to the requirements of sections 60-501 to 60-569, may be certified as proof of financial responsibility under sections 60-501 to 60-569.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 45, p. 498.